Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,277
Recreation camps; minimum health and safety requirements; violations; enforcement, penalties, or other remedies; established by local government.

Any person who violates the minimum health and safety requirements of a recreation camp which were established by the local government which exercises jurisdiction over such recreation camp shall be subject to enforcement, penalties, or other remedies as established by such local government.

Laws 1959, c. 328, § 7, p. 1195;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 170;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 71-3107;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 17;

Laws 2026, LB759, § 34.
July 18, 2026